Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-406
Membership dues; fees for lobbying services; disclosure required.

(1) For purposes of this section, political subdivision means a village, a city, a county, a school district, a community college, an educational service unit, a public power district, a natural resources district, or any other unit of local government.

(2) Each political subdivision shall publicly disclose the following on its website:

(a) Membership dues paid annually to any association or organization, identifying each such association or organization and the dues amounts paid; and

(b) Fees paid to any individual lobbyist or lobbying firm other than any fees paid for lobbying services that may be included in the membership dues described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section.

(3) For any political subdivision that does not have a website, the information described in subsection (2) of this section shall be made available upon request to any member of the public at the office of such political subdivision.

Laws 2024, LB304, § 1.